DI-282

DIAGNOSTICS - ABS&VEHICLESTABILITY CONTROL (VSC) &
BRAKE ASSIST (BA) SYSTEM

DI6XS-03

DTC C 1254 /54 Pressure Switch Circuit
CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

Either of the following 1. or 2. is detected:
1. After turning the ignition SW.ItCh ON, short or open circuit « Pressure switch (PHor PL)

C1254/54 in pressure switch (PL) continued for more than 1 sec. ) o

. L . . ¢ Pressure switch circuit
2. After turning the ignition switch ON open in pressure
switch (PH) continued for more than 1 sec.
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DIAGNOSTICS - ABS & VEHICLE STABILITY CONTROL (VSC) & DI-283

BRAKE ASSIST (BA) SYSTEM

INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Check pressure switch (PL) resistance.

F09987

@

PREPARATION:
(@) Disconnect the connector (8P) from the hydraulic brake
booster.

(b)  With ignition switch OFF, depress the brake pedal more
than 40 times to decrease the accumulator pressure.
HINT:
When a pressure in power supply system is released, reaction
force becomes light and stroke becomes longer.
CHECK:
Measure resistance between terminals PL and PLG of hydrau-
lic brake booster connector.
OK:
Resistance: 5.1 - 6.3 kQ
HINT:
After inspection, connect the connector and clear the DTC (See
page DI-185).

NG> Replace hydraulic brake booster assembly.

2 | Check pressure switch (PH) resistance.
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PREPARATION:
(@) Disconnect the connector (5P) from the hydraulic brake
booster.

(b)  With ignition switch OFF, depress the brake pedal more
than 40 times to decrease the accumulator pressure.
HINT:
When a pressure in power supply system is released, reaction
force becomes light and stroke becomes longer.
CHECK:
Measure resistance between terminals PH and PHG of hydrau-
lic brake booster connector.
OK:
Resistance: 0.9 - 1.1 kQ
HINT:
After inspection, connect the connector and clear the DTC (See
page DI-185).
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BRAKE ASSIST (BA) SYSTEM

NG> Replace hydraulic brake booster assembly.

OK

3 | Check for open and short circuit in harness and connector between pressure
switch and skid control ECU (See page IN-38).

NG> Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK

Check and replace skid control ECU.
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